Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 15.04.402 and 1994 c 46 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:The department shall seek to enhance, protect, and perpetuate the ability of the private sector to produce food and fiber. Additionally, the department shall seek, consistent with its regulatory responsibilities, to maintain the economic well-being of the agricultural industry and its dependent rural community in Washington state. Agritourism activities in accordance with section 2 of this act stabilize and help protect the economic well-being of the agricultural industry and shall be supported by the department's rules and programs.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:(1) Agritourism activities are authorized on lands zoned for agricultural production, on land where there is a farm or ranch, and on lands used for agricultural activities, and are not conditional uses requiring permits.(2) Counties may not enact or enforce official controls, ordinances, or regulations that would prohibit or unreasonably restrict agritourism. Public health, safety, and building code provisions apply. These activities are not conditional uses that require the agricultural operator to pay the county fees or require approval from the county.(3) For purposes of this section, "agritourism activity" means any activity carried out on a farm or ranch whose primary business activity is agriculture or ranching and that allows members of the general public, for recreational, entertainment, or educational purposes, to view or enjoy rural activities including, but not limited to: Farming; ranching; historic, cultural, and on-site educational programs; recreational farming programs that may include on-site hospitality services; sales of products and food services; guided and self-guided tours; petting zoos; farm festivals and celebrations; corn mazes; harvest-your-own operations; hayrides, sleighrides, or other modes of travel to explore the farm; parties and events that occur within barns; horseback riding; fishing; and camping.Sec. 3. RCW 36.70A.030 and 2025 c 267 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Active transportation" means forms of pedestrian mobility including walking or running, the use of a mobility assistive device such as a wheelchair, bicycling and cycling irrespective of the number of wheels, and the use of small personal devices such as foot scooters or skateboards. Active transportation includes both traditional and electric assist bicycles and other devices. Planning for active transportation must consider and address accommodation pursuant to the Americans with disabilities act and the distinct needs of each form of active transportation.(2) "Active transportation facilities" means facilities provided for the safety and mobility of active transportation users including, but not limited to, trails, as defined in RCW 47.30.005, sidewalks, bike lanes, shared-use paths, and other facilities in the public right-of-way.(3) "Administrative design review" means a development permit process whereby an application is reviewed, approved, or denied by the planning director or the planning director's designee based solely on objective design and development standards without a public predecision hearing, unless such review is otherwise required by state or federal law, or the structure is a designated landmark or historic district established under a local preservation ordinance. A city may utilize public meetings, hearings, or voluntary review boards to consider, recommend, or approve requests for variances from locally established design review standards.(4) "Adopt a comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new comprehensive land use plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use plan.(5) "Affordable housing" means, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, residential housing whose monthly costs, including utilities other than telephone, do not exceed 30 percent of the monthly income of a household whose income is:(a) For rental housing, 60 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development; or(b) For owner-occupied housing, 80 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(6) "Agricultural land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial production of horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial significance for agricultural production.(7) "Bus station area" means all lots that are:(a) Fully within an urban growth area; and(b) Fully or partially within one-quarter mile walking distance of a stop on a fixed route bus system that is designated as a bus rapid transit stop in the transit development plan as required in RCW 35.58.2795, for which an environmental determination has been issued as required under chapter 43.21C RCW, and that features fixed transit assets that indicate permanent, high capacity service including, but not limited to, elevated platforms or enhanced stations, off-board fare collection, dedicated lanes, busways, or transit signal priority.(8) "City" means any city or town, including a code city.(9) "Comprehensive land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan" means a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the governing body of a county or city that is adopted pursuant to this chapter.(10) "Cottage housing" means residential units on a lot with a common open space that either: (a) Is owned in common; or (b) has units owned as condominium units with property owned in common and a minimum of 20 percent of the lot size as open space.(11) "Courtyard apartments" means attached dwelling units arranged on two or three sides of a yard or court.(12) "Critical areas" include the following areas and ecosystems: (a) Wetlands; (b) areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers used for potable water; (c) fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; and (e) geologically hazardous areas. "Fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas" does not include such artificial features or constructs as irrigation delivery systems, irrigation infrastructure, irrigation canals, or drainage ditches that lie within the boundaries of and are maintained by a port district or an irrigation district or company.(13) "Department" means the department of commerce.(14) "Development regulations" or "regulation" means the controls placed on development or land use activities by a county or city, including, but not limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances, shoreline master programs, official controls, planned unit development ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together with any amendments thereto. A development regulation does not include a decision to approve a project permit application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though the decision may be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body of the county or city.(15) "Emergency housing" means temporary indoor accommodations for individuals or families who are homeless or at imminent risk of becoming homeless that is intended to address the basic health, food, clothing, and personal hygiene needs of individuals or families. Emergency housing may or may not require occupants to enter into a lease or an occupancy agreement.(16) "Emergency shelter" means a facility that provides a temporary shelter for individuals or families who are currently homeless. Emergency shelter may not require occupants to enter into a lease or an occupancy agreement. Emergency shelter facilities may include day and warming centers that do not provide overnight accommodations.(17) "Environmental justice" means the fair treatment and meaningful involvement of all people regardless of race, color, national origin, or income with respect to development, implementation, and enforcement of environmental laws, regulations, and policies. Environmental justice includes addressing disproportionate environmental and health impacts in all laws, rules, and policies with environmental impacts by prioritizing vulnerable populations and overburdened communities and the equitable distribution of resources and benefits.(18) "Extremely low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below 30 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(19) "Floor area ratio" means a measure of development intensity equal to building square footage divided by the developable property square footage. Developable property excludes public facilities and portions of lots with critical areas and critical area buffers as designated in RCW 36.70A.060, except for critical aquifer recharge areas where a single-family detached house is an allowed use provided that any requirements to maintain aquifer recharge are met.(20) "Forestland" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically and practically managed for such production, including Christmas trees subject to the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, and that has long-term commercial significance. In determining whether forestland is primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically and practically managed for such production, the following factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban, suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for timber production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and services conducive to conversion of forestland to other uses.(21) "Freight rail dependent uses" means buildings and other infrastructure that are used in the fabrication, processing, storage, and transport of goods where the use is dependent on and makes use of an adjacent short line railroad. Such facilities are both urban and rural development for purposes of this chapter. "Freight rail dependent uses" does not include buildings and other infrastructure that are used in the fabrication, processing, storage, and transport of coal, liquefied natural gas, or "crude oil" as defined in RCW 90.56.010.(22) "Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that because of their susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological events, are not suited to the siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development consistent with public health or safety concerns.(23) "Green infrastructure" means a wide array of natural assets and built structures within an urban growth area boundary, including parks and other areas with protected tree canopy, and management practices at multiple scales that manage wet weather and that maintain and restore natural hydrology by storing, infiltrating, evapotranspiring, and harvesting and using stormwater.(24) "Green space" means an area of land, vegetated by natural features such as grass, trees, or shrubs, within an urban context and less than one acre in size that creates public value through one or more of the following attributes:(a) Is accessible to the public;(b) Promotes physical and mental health of residents;(c) Provides relief from the urban heat island effects;(d) Promotes recreational and aesthetic values;(e) Protects streams or water supply; or(f) Preserves visual quality along highway, road, or street corridors.(25) "Long-term commercial significance" includes the growing capacity, productivity, and soil composition of the land for long-term commercial production, in consideration with the land's proximity to population areas, and the possibility of more intense uses of the land.(26) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below 80 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(27) "Major transit stop" means:(a) A stop on a high capacity transportation system funded or expanded under the provisions of chapter 81.104 RCW, except for any stop that solely serves express bus service or serves express bus service and other bus services not otherwise meeting the definition of major transit stop;(b) Commuter rail stops;(c) Stops on rail or fixed guideway systems; or(d) Stops on bus rapid transit routes, including those stops that are under construction.(28) "Middle housing" means buildings that are compatible in scale, form, and character with single-family houses and contain two or more attached, stacked, or clustered homes including duplexes, triplexes, fourplexes, fiveplexes, sixplexes, townhouses, stacked flats, courtyard apartments, and cottage housing.(29) "Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic substances.(30) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below 120 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(31) "Overburdened community" means a geographic area where vulnerable populations face combined, multiple environmental harms and health impacts, and includes, but is not limited to, highly impacted communities as defined in RCW 19.405.020.(32) "Per capita vehicle miles traveled" means the number of miles traveled using cars and light trucks in a calendar year divided by the number of residents in Washington. The calculation of this value excludes vehicle miles driven conveying freight.(33) "Permanent supportive housing" is subsidized, leased housing with no limit on length of stay that prioritizes people who need comprehensive support services to retain tenancy and utilizes admissions practices designed to use lower barriers to entry than would be typical for other subsidized or unsubsidized rental housing, especially related to rental history, criminal history, and personal behaviors. Permanent supportive housing is paired with on-site or off-site voluntary services designed to support a person living with a complex and disabling behavioral health or physical health condition who was experiencing homelessness or was at imminent risk of homelessness prior to moving into housing to retain their housing and be a successful tenant in a housing arrangement, improve the resident's health status, and connect the resident of the housing with community-based health care, treatment, or employment services. Permanent supportive housing is subject to all of the rights and responsibilities defined in chapter 59.18 RCW.(34) "Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways, sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic water systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational facilities, and schools.(35) "Public services" include fire protection and suppression, law enforcement, public health, education, recreation, environmental protection, and other governmental services.(36) "Rail station area" means all lots fully within an urban growth area that are:(a) Fully or partially within one-half mile walking distance of an entrance to a train station with a stop on a light rail system, a commuter rail stop in a city with a population greater than 15,000, or a stop on a rail trolley operated west of the crest of the Cascade mountains; or(b) Fully or partially within one-quarter mile walking distance of an entrance to a train station with a commuter rail stop in a city with a population no greater than 15,000.(37) "Recreational land" means land so designated under RCW 36.70A.1701 and that, immediately prior to this designation, was designated as agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170. Recreational land must have playing fields and supporting facilities existing before July 1, 2004, for sports played on grass playing fields.(38) "Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and development established by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive plan:(a) In which open space, the natural landscape, and vegetation predominate over the built environment;(b) That foster traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and opportunities to both live and work in rural areas, and fortify agritourism activities in compliance with section 2 of this act;(c) That provide visual landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and communities;(d) That are compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and wildlife habitat;(e) That reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low-density development;(f) That generally do not require the extension of urban governmental services; and(g) That are consistent with the protection of natural surface water flows and groundwater and surface water recharge and discharge areas.(39) "Rural development" refers to development outside the urban growth area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a variety of uses and residential densities, including clustered residential development, at levels that are consistent with the preservation of rural character and the requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural areas.(40) "Rural governmental services" or "rural services" include those public services and public facilities historically and typically delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may include domestic water systems and fire and police protection services associated with rural development and normally not associated with urban areas. Rural services do not include storm or sanitary sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW 36.70A.110(4).(41) "Short line railroad" means those railroad lines designated class II or class III by the United States surface transportation board.(42) "Single-family zones" means those zones where single-family detached housing is the predominant land use.(43) "Stacked flat" means dwelling units in a residential building of no more than three stories on a residential zoned lot in which each floor may be separately rented or owned.(44) "Station area" means a bus station area or a rail station area.(45) "Townhouses" means buildings that contain three or more attached single-family dwelling units that extend from foundation to roof and that have a yard or public way on not less than two sides.(46) "Transportation system" means all infrastructure and services for all forms of transportation within a geographical area, irrespective of the responsible jurisdiction or transportation provider.(47) "Urban governmental services" or "urban services" include those public services and public facilities at an intensity historically and typically provided in cities, specifically including storm and sanitary sewer systems, domestic water systems, street cleaning services, fire and police protection services, public transit services, and other public utilities associated with urban areas and normally not associated with rural areas.(48) "Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of land for the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to such a degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of land for the production of food, other agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of mineral resources, rural uses, rural development, and natural resource lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A pattern of more intensive rural development, as provided in RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread over wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban governmental services. "Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban growth located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area with urban growth on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.(49) "Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a county pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.(50) "Very low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below 50 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(51)(a) "Vulnerable populations" means population groups that are more likely to be at higher risk for poor health outcomes in response to environmental harms, due to: (i) Adverse socioeconomic factors, such as unemployment, high housing and transportation costs relative to income, limited access to nutritious food and adequate health care, linguistic isolation, and other factors that negatively affect health outcomes and increase vulnerability to the effects of environmental harms; and (ii) sensitivity factors, such as low birth weight and higher rates of hospitalization.(b) "Vulnerable populations" includes, but is not limited to:(i) Racial or ethnic minorities;(ii) Low-income populations; and(iii) Populations disproportionately impacted by environmental harms.(52) "Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are inundated or saturated by surface water or groundwater at a frequency and duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the construction of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to mitigate conversion of wetlands.(53) "Wildland urban interface" means the geographical area where structures and other human development meets or intermingles with wildland vegetative fuels.Sec. 4. RCW 36.70A.060 and 2023 c 225 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, and each city within such county, shall adopt development regulations on or before September 1, 1991, to assure the conservation of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations adopted under this subsection may not prohibit uses legally existing on any parcel prior to their adoption and shall remain in effect until the county or city adopts development regulations pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040. Such regulations shall assure that the use of lands adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral resource lands shall not interfere with the continued use, in the accustomed manner and in accordance with best management practices, of these designated lands for the production of food, agricultural products, or timber, or for the extraction of minerals. Agritourism activities are authorized on agricultural lands, must be fortified by counties and cities in compliance with section 2 of this act, and are consistent with conserving agricultural lands. Any county located to the west of the crest of the Cascade mountains that has both a population of at least four hundred thousand and a border that touches another state, and any city in such county, may adopt development regulations to assure that agriculture, forest, and mineral resource lands adjacent to short line railroads may be developed for freight rail dependent uses.(b) Counties and cities shall require that all plats, short plats, development permits, and building permits issued for development activities on, or within five hundred feet of, lands designated as agricultural lands, forestlands, or mineral resource lands, contain a notice that the subject property is within or near designated agricultural lands, forestlands, or mineral resource lands on which a variety of commercial activities may occur that are not compatible with residential development for certain periods of limited duration. The notice for mineral resource lands shall also inform that an application might be made for mining-related activities, including mining, extraction, washing, crushing, stockpiling, blasting, transporting, and recycling of minerals.(c) Each county that adopts a resolution of partial planning under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b), and each city within such county, shall adopt development regulations within one year after the adoption of the resolution of partial planning to assure the conservation of agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations adopted under this subsection (1)(c) must comply with the requirements governing regulations adopted under (a) of this subsection.(d)(i) A county that adopts a resolution of partial planning under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b) and that is not in compliance with the planning requirements of this section, RCW 36.70A.040(4), 36.70A.070(5), 36.70A.170, and 36.70A.172 at the time the resolution is adopted must, by January 30, 2017, apply for a determination of compliance from the department finding that the county's development regulations, including development regulations adopted to protect critical areas, and comprehensive plans are in compliance with the requirements of this section, RCW 36.70A.040(4), 36.70A.070(5), 36.70A.170, and 36.70A.172. The department must approve or deny the application for a determination of compliance within one hundred twenty days of its receipt or by June 30, 2017, whichever date is earlier.(ii) If the department denies an application under (d)(i) of this subsection, the county and each city within is obligated to comply with all requirements of this chapter and the resolution for partial planning adopted under RCW 36.70A.040(2)(b) is no longer in effect.(iii) A petition for review of a determination of compliance under (d)(i) of this subsection may only be appealed to the growth management hearings board within 60 days of the issuance of the decision by the department.(iv) In the event of a filing of a petition in accordance with (d)(iii) of this subsection, the county and the department must equally share the costs incurred by the department for defending an approval of determination of compliance that is before the growth management hearings board.(v) The department may implement this subsection (1)(d) by adopting rules related to determinations of compliance. The rules may address, but are not limited to: The requirements for applications for a determination of compliance; charging of costs under (d)(iv) of this subsection; procedures for processing applications; criteria for the evaluation of applications; issuance and notice of department decisions; and applicable timelines.(e) Any county that borders both the Cascade mountains and another country and has a population of less than fifty thousand people, and any city in such county, may adopt development regulations to assure that agriculture, forest, and mineral resource lands adjacent to short line railroads may be developed for freight rail dependent uses.(2) Each county and city shall adopt development regulations that protect critical areas that are required to be designated under RCW 36.70A.170. For counties and cities that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the counties and cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on or before March 1, 1992.(3) Such counties and cities shall review these designations and development regulations when adopting their comprehensive plans under RCW 36.70A.040 and implementing development regulations under RCW 36.70A.120 and may alter such designations and development regulations to ensure consistency.(4)(a) A city with a population fewer than 25,000 may adopt the county's critical areas regulations by reference to satisfy the requirements under this section to designate and protect critical areas; provided, that the county's critical areas regulations are not subject to any outstanding administrative or judicial appeals at the time of the city's adoption. Nothing in this subsection prohibits a city from adopting its own critical areas regulations.(b) The city legislative action adopting the county regulations by reference must incorporate future amendments to the critical areas policies and development regulations of the county.(c) A city that adopts the county's critical areas regulations by reference is not required to take legislative action to review and update development regulations protecting critical areas under RCW 36.70A.130.(d) If grant funding is available for a local jurisdiction's periodic comprehensive planning updates as required in RCW 36.70A.070, and a city has adopted by reference the county's critical areas regulations as allowed in (a) through (c) of this subsection, the county in which the city is located shall be entitled to the portion of the city's grant funding that would otherwise have been utilized for updating the city's critical areas regulations. The department is authorized to determine what portion of the available grant funding the city would have received for the critical areas regulations update the county is entitled to receive.(5) Forestland and agricultural land located within urban growth areas shall not be designated by a county or city as forestland or agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170 unless the city or county has enacted a program authorizing transfer or purchase of development rights.Sec. 5. RCW 36.70A.177 and 2006 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A county or a city may use a variety of innovative zoning techniques in areas designated as agricultural lands of long-term commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170. The innovative zoning techniques should be designed to conserve agricultural lands and encourage the agricultural economy. Agritourism activities fortify the agricultural economy and are consistent with conserving agricultural lands. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a county or city should encourage nonagricultural uses to be limited to lands with poor soils or otherwise not suitable for agricultural purposes.(2) Innovative zoning techniques a county or city may consider include, but are not limited to:(a) Agricultural zoning, which limits the density of development and restricts or prohibits nonfarm uses of agricultural land and may allow accessory uses, including nonagricultural accessory uses and activities, that support, promote, or sustain agricultural operations and production, as provided in subsection (3) of this section;(b) Cluster zoning, which allows new development on one portion of the land, leaving the remainder in agricultural or open space uses;(c) Large lot zoning, which establishes as a minimum lot size the amount of land necessary to achieve a successful farming practice;(d) Quarter/quarter zoning, which permits one residential dwelling on a one-acre minimum lot for each one-sixteenth of a section of land; and(e) Sliding scale zoning, which allows the number of lots for single-family residential purposes with a minimum lot size of one acre to increase inversely as the size of the total acreage increases.(3) Accessory uses allowed under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall comply with the following:(a) Accessory uses shall be located, designed, and operated so as to not interfere with, and to support the continuation of, the overall agricultural use of the property and neighboring properties, and shall comply with the requirements of this chapter;(b) Accessory uses may include:(i) Agricultural accessory uses and activities, including but not limited to the storage, distribution, and marketing of regional agricultural products from one or more producers, agriculturally related experiences, or the production, marketing, and distribution of value-added agricultural products, including support services that facilitate these activities; and(ii) Nonagricultural accessory uses and activities as long as they are consistent with the size, scale, and intensity of the existing agricultural use of the property and the existing buildings on the site. Nonagricultural accessory uses and activities, including new buildings, parking, or supportive uses, shall not be located outside the general area already developed for buildings and residential uses and shall not otherwise convert more than one acre of agricultural land to nonagricultural uses; and(c) Counties and cities have the authority to limit or exclude accessory uses otherwise authorized in this subsection (3) in areas designated as agricultural lands of long-term commercial significance.(4) This section shall not be interpreted to limit agricultural production on designated agricultural lands or regulate agritourism activities in a manner inconsistent with section 2 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. The department of commerce is directed to immediately modify rules or guidance documents that are not consistent with the provisions of this act or restrict agritourism activities.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.--- END ---